FOMA/turk.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +Suff
LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON Verb

yaz Vinf;
yazɪl Vinf;
bur Vinf;
burul Vinf;
giy Vinf;
giyin Vinf;
seviş Vinf;
görün Vinf;
görüş Vinf;
öpüş Vinf;
doğ Vinf;
doğur Vinf;
bat Vinf;
piş Vinf;
pişir Vinf;
geҫ Vinf;
düş Vinf;
tut Vinf;

LEXICON Vinf

+V+Suff: m^ek	#;
